Hawaii statutes.
§387-4 Wage discrimination prohibited.
No employer shall discriminate in any way in the payment of wages as between
persons of different races or religions or as between the sexes; provided that
nothing herein shall prohibit a variation of rates of pay for employees engaged
in the same classification of work based upon a difference in seniority, length
of service, substantial difference in duties or services performed, difference
in the shift or time of day worked, or hours of work; and provided that an employer
who is paying a wage rate differential in violation of this section shall not,
in order to comply with this section, reduce the wage rate of any employee. [L
1959, c 122, §2; Supp, §94-4.5; HRS §387-4; am L 1972, c 63, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next